District of Columbia statutes.
1-612.37

Prohibition of coercion.

An employee shall not directly or indirectly intimidate, threaten, or coerce any other employee for the purpose of interfering with any right that the employee may exercise to contribute, receive, or use annual or universal leave.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1237
as added Feb. 6, 2004, D.C. Law 15-68, § 2, 50 DCR 9819

History